ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 425 Y 28
SFX 425 0 a .
SFX 425 0 ažkuli .
SFX 425 0 e .
SFX 425 0 ego .
SFX 425 0 egožkuli .
SFX 425 0 ej .
SFX 425 0 eje .
SFX 425 0 eježkuli .
SFX 425 0 eju .
SFX 425 0 ejužkuli .
SFX 425 0 ejžkuli .
SFX 425 0 em .
SFX 425 0 emu .
SFX 425 0 emužkuli .
SFX 425 0 emžkuli .
SFX 425 0 ežkuli .
SFX 425 0 u .
SFX 425 0 užkuli .
SFX 425 0 y .
SFX 425 0 ych .
SFX 425 0 ychžkuli .
SFX 425 0 ym .
SFX 425 0 yma .
SFX 425 0 ymažkuli .
SFX 425 0 ymi .
SFX 425 0 ymižkuli .
SFX 425 0 ymžkuli .
SFX 425 0 yžkuli .
SFX 426 Y 7
SFX 426 0 ch .
SFX 426 0 chmej .
SFX 426 0 chmy .
SFX 426 0 chu .
SFX 426 0 šo .
SFX 426 0 štej .
SFX 426 0 šćo .
SFX 427 Y 7
SFX 427 0 ch .
SFX 427 0 chmej .
SFX 427 0 chmy .
SFX 427 0 chu .
SFX 427 0 šo .
SFX 427 0 štej .
SFX 427 0 šćo .
SFX 428 Y 16
SFX 428 0 a .
SFX 428 0 e .
SFX 428 0 ego .
SFX 428 0 ej .
SFX 428 0 eje .
SFX 428 0 eju .
SFX 428 0 em .
SFX 428 0 emu .
SFX 428 0 i .
SFX 428 0 im .
SFX 428 0 u .
SFX 428 0 y .
SFX 428 0 ych .
SFX 428 0 ym .
SFX 428 0 yma .
SFX 428 0 ymi .
SFX 429 Y 7
SFX 429 0 o .
SFX 429 0 om .
SFX 429 0 omej .
SFX 429 0 omy .
SFX 429 0 otej .
SFX 429 0 ośo .
SFX 429 0 oš .
SFX 430 Y 28
SFX 430 0 a .
SFX 430 0 ach .
SFX 430 0 achmej .
SFX 430 0 achmy .
SFX 430 0 achu .
SFX 430 0 am .
SFX 430 0 ami .
SFX 430 0 ašo .
SFX 430 0 aštej .
SFX 430 0 ašćo .
SFX 430 0 e .
SFX 430 0 i .
SFX 430 0 im .
SFX 430 0 imej .
SFX 430 0 imy .
SFX 430 0 itej .
SFX 430 0 iśo .
SFX 430 0 iš .
SFX 430 0 mej .
SFX 430 0 my .
SFX 430 0 oju .
SFX 430 0 om .
SFX 430 0 oma .
SFX 430 0 ow .
SFX 430 0 owu .
SFX 430 0 tej .
SFX 430 0 u .
SFX 430 0 śo .
SFX 431 Y 8
SFX 431 0 e .
SFX 431 0 o .
SFX 431 0 om .
SFX 431 0 omej .
SFX 431 0 omy .
SFX 431 0 otej .
SFX 431 0 ośo .
SFX 431 0 oš .
SFX 432 Y 8
SFX 432 0 o .
SFX 432 0 om .
SFX 432 0 omej .
SFX 432 0 omy .
SFX 432 0 otej .
SFX 432 0 ośo .
SFX 432 0 oš .
SFX 432 0 u .
SFX 433 Y 8
SFX 433 0 o .
SFX 433 0 om .
SFX 433 0 omej .
SFX 433 0 omy .
SFX 433 0 otej .
SFX 433 0 ośo .
SFX 433 0 oš .
SFX 433 0 u .
SFX 434 Y 9
SFX 434 0 e .
SFX 434 0 o .
SFX 434 0 om .
SFX 434 0 omej .
SFX 434 0 omy .
SFX 434 0 otej .
SFX 434 0 ośo .
SFX 434 0 oš .
SFX 434 0 u .
SFX 435 Y 28
SFX 435 0 a .
SFX 435 0 ach .
SFX 435 0 achmej .
SFX 435 0 achmy .
SFX 435 0 achu .
SFX 435 0 am .
SFX 435 0 ami .
SFX 435 0 ašo .
SFX 435 0 aštej .
SFX 435 0 ašćo .
SFX 435 0 e .
SFX 435 0 i .
SFX 435 0 im .
SFX 435 0 imej .
SFX 435 0 imy .
SFX 435 0 itej .
SFX 435 0 iśo .
SFX 435 0 iš .
SFX 435 0 mej .
SFX 435 0 my .
SFX 435 0 oju .
SFX 435 0 om .
SFX 435 0 oma .
SFX 435 0 ow .
SFX 435 0 owu .
SFX 435 0 tej .
SFX 435 0 u .
SFX 435 0 ćo .
SFX 436 Y 29
SFX 436 0 a .
SFX 436 0 ach .
SFX 436 0 achmej .
SFX 436 0 achmy .
SFX 436 0 achu .
SFX 436 0 am .
SFX 436 0 ami .
SFX 436 0 ašo .
SFX 436 0 aštej .
SFX 436 0 ašćo .
SFX 436 0 e .
SFX 436 0 i .
SFX 436 0 im .
SFX 436 0 imej .
SFX 436 0 imy .
SFX 436 0 itej .
SFX 436 0 iśo .
SFX 436 0 iš .
SFX 436 0 mej .
SFX 436 0 my .
SFX 436 0 o .
SFX 436 0 oju .
SFX 436 0 om .
SFX 436 0 oma .
SFX 436 0 ow .
SFX 436 0 owu .
SFX 436 0 tej .
SFX 436 0 u .
SFX 436 0 ćo .
SFX 437 Y 14
SFX 437 0 a .
SFX 437 0 e .
SFX 437 0 ej .
SFX 437 0 eje .
SFX 437 0 eju .
SFX 437 0 o .
SFX 437 0 ogo .
SFX 437 0 om .
SFX 437 0 omu .
SFX 437 0 u .
SFX 437 0 ych .
SFX 437 0 ym .
SFX 437 0 yma .
SFX 437 0 ymi .
SFX 438 Y 14
SFX 438 0 a .
SFX 438 0 e .
SFX 438 0 ej .
SFX 438 0 eje .
SFX 438 0 eju .
SFX 438 0 o .
SFX 438 0 ogo .
SFX 438 0 om .
SFX 438 0 omu .
SFX 438 0 u .
SFX 438 0 ych .
SFX 438 0 ym .
SFX 438 0 yma .
SFX 438 0 ymi .
SFX 439 Y 31
SFX 439 0 a .
SFX 439 0 ach .
SFX 439 0 am .
SFX 439 0 ami .
SFX 439 0 e .
SFX 439 0 ego .
SFX 439 0 ej .
SFX 439 0 eje .
SFX 439 0 eju .
SFX 439 0 em .
SFX 439 0 emu .
SFX 439 0 i .
SFX 439 0 im .
SFX 439 0 imej .
SFX 439 0 imy .
SFX 439 0 itej .
SFX 439 0 iśo .
SFX 439 0 iš .
SFX 439 0 mej .
SFX 439 0 my .
SFX 439 0 oma .
SFX 439 0 ow .
SFX 439 0 owu .
SFX 439 0 tej .
SFX 439 0 u .
SFX 439 0 y .
SFX 439 0 ych .
SFX 439 0 ym .
SFX 439 0 yma .
SFX 439 0 ymi .
SFX 439 0 śo .
SFX 440 Y 15
SFX 440 0 a .
SFX 440 0 e .
SFX 440 0 ej .
SFX 440 0 eje .
SFX 440 0 eju .
SFX 440 0 o .
SFX 440 0 og .
SFX 440 0 ogo .
SFX 440 0 om .
SFX 440 0 omu .
SFX 440 0 u .
SFX 440 0 ych .
SFX 440 0 ym .
SFX 440 0 yma .
SFX 440 0 ymi .
SFX 441 Y 16
SFX 441 0 a .
SFX 441 0 e .
SFX 441 0 ej .
SFX 441 0 eje .
SFX 441 0 eju .
SFX 441 0 en .
SFX 441 0 o .
SFX 441 0 og .
SFX 441 0 ogo .
SFX 441 0 om .
SFX 441 0 omu .
SFX 441 0 u .
SFX 441 0 ych .
SFX 441 0 ym .
SFX 441 0 yma .
SFX 441 0 ymi .
SFX 442 Y 14
SFX 442 0 e .
SFX 442 0 ech .
SFX 442 0 echmej .
SFX 442 0 echmy .
SFX 442 0 echu .
SFX 442 0 eštej .
SFX 442 0 ešćo .
SFX 442 0 o .
SFX 442 0 om .
SFX 442 0 omej .
SFX 442 0 omy .
SFX 442 0 otej .
SFX 442 0 ośo .
SFX 442 0 oš .
SFX 443 Y 34
SFX 443 0 a .
SFX 443 0 ach .
SFX 443 0 achmej .
SFX 443 0 achmy .
SFX 443 0 achu .
SFX 443 0 am .
SFX 443 0 ami .
SFX 443 0 ašo .
SFX 443 0 aštej .
SFX 443 0 ašćo .
SFX 443 0 e .
SFX 443 0 mej .
SFX 443 0 my .
SFX 443 0 oma .
SFX 443 0 ow .
SFX 443 0 owu .
SFX 443 0 tej .
SFX 443 0 u .
SFX 443 0 y .
SFX 443 0 yjo .
SFX 443 0 yjom .
SFX 443 0 yjomej .
SFX 443 0 yjomy .
SFX 443 0 yjotej .
SFX 443 0 yjośo .
SFX 443 0 yjoš .
SFX 443 0 yju .
SFX 443 0 ym .
SFX 443 0 ymej .
SFX 443 0 ymy .
SFX 443 0 ytej .
SFX 443 0 yśo .
SFX 443 0 yš .
SFX 443 0 ćo .
SFX 444 Y 14
SFX 444 0 a .
SFX 444 0 ach .
SFX 444 0 am .
SFX 444 0 ami .
SFX 444 0 i .
SFX 444 0 imej .
SFX 444 0 imy .
SFX 444 0 itej .
SFX 444 0 iśo .
SFX 444 0 oma .
SFX 444 0 ow .
SFX 444 0 owu .
SFX 444 0 u .
SFX 444 0 y .
SFX 445 Y 14
SFX 445 0 a .
SFX 445 0 ach .
SFX 445 0 am .
SFX 445 0 ami .
SFX 445 0 i .
SFX 445 0 imej .
SFX 445 0 imy .
SFX 445 0 itej .
SFX 445 0 iśo .
SFX 445 0 oma .
SFX 445 0 ow .
SFX 445 0 owu .
SFX 445 0 u .
SFX 445 0 y .
SFX 446 Y 29
SFX 446 0 a .
SFX 446 0 ach .
SFX 446 0 achmej .
SFX 446 0 achmy .
SFX 446 0 achu .
SFX 446 0 am .
SFX 446 0 ami .
SFX 446 0 ašo .
SFX 446 0 aštej .
SFX 446 0 ašćo .
SFX 446 0 e .
SFX 446 0 mej .
SFX 446 0 my .
SFX 446 0 oju .
SFX 446 0 om .
SFX 446 0 oma .
SFX 446 0 ow .
SFX 446 0 owu .
SFX 446 0 tej .
SFX 446 0 u .
SFX 446 0 y .
SFX 446 0 ym .
SFX 446 0 ymej .
SFX 446 0 ymi .
SFX 446 0 ymy .
SFX 446 0 ytej .
SFX 446 0 yśo .
SFX 446 0 yš .
SFX 446 0 ćo .
SFX 447 Y 17
SFX 447 0 a .
SFX 447 0 ach .
SFX 447 0 am .
SFX 447 0 ami .
SFX 447 0 ijo .
SFX 447 0 ijom .
SFX 447 0 ijomej .
SFX 447 0 ijomy .
SFX 447 0 ijotej .
SFX 447 0 ijośo .
SFX 447 0 ijoš .
SFX 447 0 iju .
SFX 447 0 oma .
SFX 447 0 ow .
SFX 447 0 owu .
SFX 447 0 u .
SFX 447 0 y .
SFX 448 Y 17
SFX 448 0 a .
SFX 448 0 ach .
SFX 448 0 am .
SFX 448 0 ami .
SFX 448 0 ijo .
SFX 448 0 ijom .
SFX 448 0 ijomej .
SFX 448 0 ijomy .
SFX 448 0 ijotej .
SFX 448 0 ijośo .
SFX 448 0 ijoš .
SFX 448 0 iju .
SFX 448 0 oma .
SFX 448 0 ow .
SFX 448 0 owu .
SFX 448 0 u .
SFX 448 0 y .
SFX 449 Y 16
SFX 449 0 a .
SFX 449 0 ach .
SFX 449 0 am .
SFX 449 0 ami .
SFX 449 0 i .
SFX 449 0 im .
SFX 449 0 imej .
SFX 449 0 imy .
SFX 449 0 itej .
SFX 449 0 iśo .
SFX 449 0 iš .
SFX 449 0 oma .
SFX 449 0 ow .
SFX 449 0 owu .
SFX 449 0 u .
SFX 449 0 y .
SFX 450 Y 16
SFX 450 0 a .
SFX 450 0 ach .
SFX 450 0 am .
SFX 450 0 ami .
SFX 450 0 i .
SFX 450 0 im .
SFX 450 0 imej .
SFX 450 0 imy .
SFX 450 0 itej .
SFX 450 0 iśo .
SFX 450 0 iš .
SFX 450 0 oma .
SFX 450 0 ow .
SFX 450 0 owu .
SFX 450 0 u .
SFX 450 0 y .
SFX 451 Y 17
SFX 451 0 a .
SFX 451 0 ach .
SFX 451 0 am .
SFX 451 0 ami .
SFX 451 0 i .
SFX 451 0 im .
SFX 451 0 imej .
SFX 451 0 imy .
SFX 451 0 itej .
SFX 451 0 iśo .
SFX 451 0 iš .
SFX 451 0 oma .
SFX 451 0 ow .
SFX 451 0 owu .
SFX 451 0 u .
SFX 451 0 y .
SFX 451 0 ě .
SFX 452 Y 15
SFX 452 0 i .
SFX 452 0 ijo .
SFX 452 0 ijom .
SFX 452 0 ijomej .
SFX 452 0 ijomy .
SFX 452 0 ijotej .
SFX 452 0 ijośo .
SFX 452 0 ijoš .
SFX 452 0 iju .
SFX 452 0 im .
SFX 452 0 imej .
SFX 452 0 imy .
SFX 452 0 itej .
SFX 452 0 iśo .
SFX 452 0 iš .
