ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
bron/1,449
butr/1,449
błudnjej/433
błyšć/435
campj/1,434
capj/1,434
cer/1,449
chamornjej/433
chmjel/430
chmur/1,449
chłodnjej/433
cybj/1,434
cympa/1,426
cysć/435
designěrowa/427
dešć/435
dochowan/1,428
dopśigótuj/1,432
dorosć/442
drapaw/439
drěmnj/1,429
dłypj/1,434
falowa/1,426
forsěrowan/1,428
grimj/1,434
gór/450
górjej/433
góspoz/443
głupjej/433
hampj/1,434
hur/1,449
implantěrowa/427
imponěruj/1,432
jadušyw/439
jagarjowa/1,426
kapj/1,434
kašěrowa/427
klampj/1,434
klij/430
kolonizěrowan/1,428
kopś/435
kral/430
kringel/430
kružel/430
kuntwor/1,449
kurknj/1,429
kuźer/1,449
kužd/1,425
kłopota/1,426
lapj/1,434
lenj/1,431
manźel/430
marnjej/433
min/444
mjazyfinancěrowa/427
mokś/435
mur/1,449
muś/436
mócnjej/433
mól/430
mózoluj/1,432
měn/1,449
měrnjej/433
naduwan/1,428
najmj/1,431
napojowa/1,426
nar/1,449
narosć/442
nasypj/1,434
natśěgnj/1,429
naš/440
našrotuj/1,432
našyndowan/1,428
nažołśej/433
njearetěrowa/427
njebója/1,426
njedigitalizěrowan/1,428
njedonapóraj/1,432
njedorosć/442
njedorumowa/427
njedozebjerj/1,429
njedrylowa/1,426
njegron/1,452
njegórakowa/1,426
njegłupjej/1,432
njeinspirěrowa/427
njekipj/1,434
njeklurnj/1,429
njekluwan/1,428
njekonfigurěrowa/427
njekopicowa/1,426
njemeliorěruj/1,432
njemudrjej/433
njemurksowa/1,426
njeměrnjej/433
njenapadnj/1,429
njenarosć/442
njenastuděrowa/427
njenawulicuj/1,432
njenazukowan/1,428
njenjeměrn/1,452
njepismikowa/1,426
njepołnjej/433
njepóchachnj/1,429
njepódsekuj/1,432
njepódušowa/427
njepóludn/1,452
njepómyslowa/1,426
njepórosć/442
njepóstanj/1,429
njepótyšarjowan/1,428
njepóšuźuj/1,432
njepśegrabnj/1,429
njepśekontrolěrowa/427
njepśemyslowa/1,426
njepśeměrnjej/433
njepśeměstn/1,452
njepśerosć/442
njepśeskokaj/1,432
njepśešaltowa/427
njepśeštapnj/1,429
njepśeźěrkowan/1,428
njepśijaśel/430
njepśipadowa/1,426
njepśirosć/442
njepśisrěbj/1,432
njerjeśazkowa/1,426
njerozkóstkowa/427
njerozpuknj/1,429
njerozrosć/442
njeroztwarjan/1,428
njesabotěrowa/1,426
njespódstśělaj/1,432
njespówalowa/427
njetwór/1,452
njewitkowan/1,428
njewoblědnj/1,429
njewobpudrowa/427
njewobramjowa/1,426
njewobrosć/442
njewomucnjej/433
njewudalnjuj/1,432
njewugibkowa/427
njewugron/1,452
njewukóńcowan/1,428
njewumjelknj/1,429
njewuměr/1,447
njewurosć/442
njewutor/1,452
njewuśěgowa/1,426
njewušlachtuj/1,432
njewóskokowan/1,428
njewótfilowa/427
njewótklatśnj/1,429
njewótrosć/442
njewěr/1,449
njezaeksercěrowa/427
njezajmj/1,431
njezakalkulowan/1,428
njezakiduj/1,432
njezakjawknj/1,429
njezapletowa/1,426
njezarosć/442
njezdychnj/1,429
njezeznawan/1,428
njezlipj/1,432
njeznjeglědałkowa/427
njezrosć/442
nješćipota/1,426
njeźiman/1,428
now/439
někotar/1,425
pal/430
par/450
pazor/1,449
popjel/430
połnjej/433
proznjej/433
pyr/1,449
póchórjej/1,432
pódběgnj/1,429
pógibj/1,434
póludn/1,452
pórosć/442
pówopšašan/1,428
póškarowa/1,426
pěn/1,449
płašć/435
pśeetiketěrowa/427
pśejebnj/1,429
pśejmj/1,431
pśekopj/1,434
pśeměrnjej/433
pśeměstn/1,452
pśepowdaj/1,432
pśerosć/442
pśicyn/448
pśidostawan/1,428
pśijaśel/430
pśiklapj/1,434
pśirosć/442
pśiwórj/1,434
pśiwěrcowa/427
pśizmyrknj/1,429
pśištapowa/1,426
pšosćej/433
rozmiluj/1,432
rozrosć/442
rozćiskan/1,428
ryjnjej/433
skopj/1,434
slin/450
slěpjej/433
smjerź/436
spin/1,445
spinj/1,431
spisowaśel/430
stanowa/1,426
styknj/1,429
słabjej/433
t/441
towzyntajadn/1,437
waš/438
wobcwiblowa/427
wobdłypowan/1,428
wobgratuj/1,432
woblin/1,449
wobrosć/442
wobrubj/1,434
wobtor/1,447
wobuz/443
wokidowa/1,426
wowezmj/1,429
wuglin/1,449
wukopj/1,434
wumachtan/1,428
wumucnjej/433
wuměn/1,447
wupisa/427
wuprochnjej/1,432
wurosć/442
wuscyn/1,447
wułamj/1,434
wuškrabnj/1,429
wótběžowan/1,428
wótkašlowa/1,426
wótkopj/1,434
wótmrokowa/427
wótměn/1,447
wótpluwaj/1,432
wótrosć/442
wótłamj/1,434
wótškrabnj/1,429
wótšćěpj/1,434
wóz/446
wěr/1,449
zagibj/1,434
zajmj/1,431
zakreslowan/1,428
zaměn/1,447
zapasowa/427
zarosć/442
zarubj/1,434
zarzawjej/433
zatwardnj/1,429
zawin/1,445
zawinj/1,431
zawrośuj/1,432
zawěrowa/1,426
zešwican/1,428
zgibj/1,434
změn/1,447
zogol/430
zwar/1,447
zwósobnjuj/1,432
zymnjej/433
śm/1,451
škripj/1,434
špingel/430
šwignj/1,429
šylaw/439
źibaśej/433
źěl/430
žadław/439
žwator/1,449
